src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PROPER NOUNS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP ;
:%: PROP ;
:%- PROP ;
:%' PROP ;

LEXICON PROP
+Prop: NOUN ;

!LEXICON ProperNounCases
!+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
!        -    Nouns  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
